South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S522.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Charleston Regional Airport District SECTION 1.    SECTION 2 of Act 1235 of 1970 is amended to read: SECTION 2.    The territory embraced by the County of Charleston is hereby constituted an Airport District and a political subdivision of this State, the functions of which shall be public and governmental, and the inhabitants of the territory are hereby constituted a body politic and corporate. The corporate name of the Airport District shall be Charleston Regional Airport District, and by that name the Airport District may sue and be sued. Powers and duties SECTION 2. SECTION 3 of Act 1235 of 1970 is amended to read: SECTION 3.    The corporate powers and duties of the Charleston Regional Airport District shall be exercised and performed by an authority to be known as Charleston Regional Aviation Authority. The authority shall be composed of seven members, two of whom shall be appointed by the Governor upon the recommendation of a majority of the Charleston County House Delegation, two of whom shall be appointed by the Governor upon the recommendation of a majority of the Senators from Charleston County, and one of whom shall be appointed by the Governor upon the recommendation of the City Council of Charleston and the County Council of Charleston. The remaining two members shall be the Mayor of the City of Charleston and the Chairman of the Charleston County Council who shall be ex officio members of the authority. In making the foregoing ex officio designations, the General Assembly finds that the successful operation of the airport system has a distinct relation to the welfare of the City of Charleston and the County of Charleston. It has, therefore, determined that those responsible for the operation of such municipal governments should likewise participate in the operation of the authority. The members appointed by the Governor shall serve for terms of four years and until their successors are appointed and qualify, such terms to commence on the first day of the month following the approval of this act by the Governor. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments for the unexpired portion of the term only. The members of the authority shall be allowed the usual per diem, mileage, and subsistence as provided by law for members of boards, commissions, and committees and their actual and necessary expenses while in performance of duties prescribed under this act. Time effective SECTION 3.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 6th day of May, 2025. Approved the 8th day of May, 2025. __________